Hawaii statutes.
[§321-15.61] Adult residential care homes
expanded admissions. (a) Adult residential care homes may admit an
individual who has been living immediately prior to admission in the
individual's own home, a hospital, or other care setting, and who has been
either:

(1) Admitted to a medicaid waiver program and
determined by the department of human services to require nursing facility
level care to manage the individual's physical, mental, and social functions;
or

(2) A private-paying individual certified by a
physician or advanced practice registered nurse as needing a nursing facility
level of care.

(b) The department of health shall adopt rules
in accordance with chapter 91 to expand admissions to adult residential care
homes by level of care and to define and standardize these levels of care. The
rules and standards shall provide for appropriate and adequate requirements for
knowledge and training of adult residential care home operators and their
employees. [L 1998, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next